Maryland, session 2026, SB0671.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
9–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) (1) “Owner” means:
[(1)] (I) The owner of the land; or
[(2)] (II) An owner’s tenant for life or for years, provided the tenant enters
into the contract with the contractor.
(2) “OWNER” MAY INCLUDE A COUNTY, MUNICIPAL CORPORATION,
BOARD OF EDUCATION, OR PUBLIC AUTHORITY OR INSTRUMENTALITY.
9–302.
(a) Except for work done or materials furnished under a contract enumerated in
§ 9–305 of this subtitle, a contractor or subcontractor who does work or furnishes material
under a contract shall be entitled to prompt payment under subsection (b) of this section.
(b) (1) If the contract is with an owner, the owner shall:
(i) If the contract does not provide for specific dates or times of
payment, pay to the contractor undisputed amounts owed under the terms of the written
contract, within the earlier of:
1. 30 days after the day on which the occupancy permit is
granted; or
2. 30 days after the day on which the owner or the owner’s
agent takes possession; or
(ii) If the contract provides for specific dates or times of payment,
pay to the contractor undisputed amounts owed within 7 days after the date or time
specified in the contract.
(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection does not apply to any contract between
the contractor and[:

SENATE BILL 671 3
(i) The] THE State[;
(ii) A county;
(iii) A municipal corporation;
(iv) A board of education; or
(v) A public authority or instrumentality].
(3) If the contract is not with an owner, the contractor or subcontractor
shall pay undisputed amounts owed to its subcontractors within 7 days after receipt by the
contractor or subcontractor of each payment received for its subcontractors’ work or
materials.
(C) (1) IF A PARTY WITHHOLDS ALL OR PART OF AN AMOUNT INVOICED
BY A PERFORMING PARTY UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE
WITHHOLDING PARTY SHALL NOTIFY THE PERFORMING PARTY IN WRITING AND
WITH REASONABLE SPECIFICITY WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER THE RECEIPT OF THE
INVOICE OF THE INTENTION TO WITHHOLD ALL OR PART OF THE PAYMENT AND THE
REASON FOR WITHHOLDING, INCLUDING IDENTIFYING THE WORK FOR WHICH
PAYMENT IS NOT BEING MADE AND THE AMOUNT BEING WITHHELD FOR THAT WORK.
(2) ANY PAYMENT WITHHELD UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT
EXCEED TWICE THE AMOUNT IN DISPUTE.
(D) (1) IF A PARTY FAILS TO MAKE PAYMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, INTEREST SHALL ACCRUE AT THE RATE OF 2%
PER MONTH ON ANY AMOUNT THAT REMAINS UNPAID.
(2) INTEREST UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) SHALL ACCRUE BEGINNING ON THE 61ST DAY AFTER A
PARTY RECEIVES AN INVOICE SUBMITTED UNDER THE TERMS OF THE CONTRACT;
(II) SHALL BE PAID TO THE PERFORMING PARTY AT THE TIME
OF PAYMENT OF THE INVOICE; AND
(III) MAY NOT BE WITHHELD FROM A PERFORMING PARTY.
(3) THE REQUIREMENTS FOR THE ACCRUAL AND PAYMENT OF
INTEREST UNDER THIS SECTION:

SENATE BILL 671
(I) MAY NOT BE WAIVED BY ANY PARTY; AND
(II) MAY NOT BE ALTERED BY CONTRACT.
(E) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO APPLY TO OR
PROHIBIT THE INCLUSION OF ANY RETAINAGE PROVISIONS IN A CONSTRUCTION
CONTRACT.
(F) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN EMERGENCY
CONTRACT ENTERED INTO WITH A COUNTY, MUNICIPAL CORPORATION, BOARD OF
EDUCATION, OR PUBLIC AUTHORITY OR INSTRUMENTALITY.
(2) A CONTRACTOR OR SUBCONTRACTOR WHO HAS NOT RECEIVED
PAYMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, AFTER
PROVIDING 14 DAYS’ WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE OWNER OR PARTY RESPONSIBLE FOR
PAYMENT, MAY STOP WORK UNTIL PAYMENT IS RECEIVED.
(3) A CONTRACTOR OR SUBCONTRACTOR WHO STOPS WORK UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE REPLACED BY THE OWNER OR GENERAL
CONTRACTOR OR SUBCONTRACTOR OR DEEMED IN VIOLATION OR DEFAULT OF THE
APPLICABLE CONTRACT.
9–303.
(a) In this section, “undisputed amounts” includes any retention proceeds that
exceed the amount authorized to be retained under § 9–304 of this subtitle.
(b) In addition to any other remedy provided under any other provision of law, a
court of competent jurisdiction, for good cause shown may:
(1) Award any equitable relief for prompt payment of undisputed amounts
that it considers necessary, including the enjoining of further violations; and
(2) In any action, award to the prevailing party:
(i) Interest from the date the court determines that the amount
owed was due; and
(ii) Any reasonable costs incurred.
(c) If a court determines that an owner, contractor, or subcontractor has acted in
bad faith by failing to pay any undisputed amounts owed as required under § 9–302 of this
subtitle, the court may award to the prevailing party reasonable attorney’s fees.
Article – State Finance and Procurement

SENATE BILL 671 5
11–101.
(a) In this Division II the following words have the meanings indicated unless:
(1) the context clearly requires a different meaning; or
(2) a different definition is provided for a particular title or provision.
(b) (1) “Architectural services” means professional or creative work that:
(i) is performed in connection with the design and supervision of
construction or landscaping; and
(ii) requires architectural education, training, and experience.
(2) “Architectural services” includes consultation, research, investigation,
evaluation, planning, architectural design and preparation of related documents, and
coordination of services that structural, civil, mechanical, and electrical engineers and
other consultants provide.
(3) “Architectural services” does not include construction inspection
services, services provided in connection with an energy performance contract, or
structural, mechanical, plumbing, or electrical engineering.
(c) “Bid” means a response to an invitation for bids under § 13–103 of this article.
(d) “Board” means the Board of Public Works.
(e) “Chief Procurement Officer” means an official of the Department of General
Services who:
(1) shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the
Senate;
(2) except for procurement activity by a primary procurement unit other
than the Department of General Services, is the head of all procurement activity for the
Executive Branch of State government; and
(3) may engage in or control procurement for the Department of General
Services in accordance with § 12–107(b)(2) of this article.
(f) (1) “Construction” means the process of building, altering, improving, or
demolishing an improvement to real property.
(2) “Construction” includes any major work necessary to repair, prevent
damage to, or sustain existing components of an improvement to real property.

SENATE BILL 671
(3) “Construction” does not include the maintenance or routine operation
of an existing improvement to real property, or activities related to an energy performance
contract.
(F–1) (1) “CONSTRUCTION CONTRACT” MEANS A CONTRACT TO PERFORM
CONSTRUCTION–RELATED SERVICES THAT IS BETWEEN:
(I) A CONTRACTOR AND A SUBCONTRACTOR; OR
(II) A SUBCONTRACTOR AND LOWER–TIER SUBCONTRACTOR.
(2) “CONSTRUCTION CONTRACT” DOES NOT INCLUDE A CONTRACT
FOR SALE, HOUSING, OR HOME IMPROVEMENT, AS DEFINED IN § 8–101 OF THE
BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE.
(g) (1) “Construction related services” means feasibility studies, surveys,
construction management, construction inspection, and similar efforts associated with
construction or the acquisition of public improvements as defined in § 4–401(d) of this
article.
(2) “Construction related services” does not include services provided in
connection with an energy performance contract.
(G–1) “CONTRACTOR” MEANS A PARTY TO A PROCUREMENT CONTRACT
OTHER THAN A UNIT.
(h) “County” means a county of the State and, unless expressly provided
otherwise, Baltimore City.
(i) “Energy performance contract” means an agreement for the provision of
energy services, including electricity, heating, ventilation, cooling, steam, or hot water, in
which a person agrees to design, install, finance, maintain, or manage energy systems or
equipment to improve the energy efficiency of a building or facility in exchange for a portion
of the energy savings.
(j) (1) “Engineering services” means professional or creative work that:
(i) is performed in connection with any utility, structure, building,
machine, equipment, or process, including structural, mechanical, plumbing, electrical,
geotechnical, and environmental engineering; and
(ii) requires engineering education, training, and experience in the
application of special knowledge of the mathematical, physical, and engineering sciences.

SENATE BILL 671 7
(2) “Engineering services” includes consultation, investigation, evaluation,
planning, design, and inspection of construction to interpret and ensure compliance with
specifications and design within the scope of inspection services.
(3) “Engineering services” does not include services provided in connection
with an energy performance contract.
(k) “Information technology” has the meaning stated in § 3.5–301 of this article.
(l) “Invitation for bids” means any document used for soliciting bids under §
13–103 of this article.
(L–1) “LOWER–TIER SUBCONTRACTOR” MEANS A PERSON WHO WILL
PERFORM ALL OR PART OF THE CONSTRUCTION–RELATED SERVICES ON A
CONSTRUCTION CONTRACT UNDER AN AGREEMENT WITH A SUBCONTRACTOR,
REGARDLESS OF TIER.
(m) “Person” means an individual, receiver, trustee, guardian, personal
representative, fiduciary, or representative of any kind and any partnership, firm,
association, corporation, or other entity.
(n) “Primary procurement units” means:
(1) the State Treasurer;
(2) the Department of General Services;
(3) the Department of Transportation;
(4) the University System of Maryland;
(5) the Maryland Port Commission;
(6) the Morgan State University; and
(7) the St. Mary’s College of Maryland.
(o) (1) “Procurement” means the process of:
(i) leasing real or personal property as lessee; or
(ii) buying or otherwise obtaining supplies, services, construction,
construction related services, architectural services, engineering services, or services
provided under an energy performance contract.
(2) “Procurement” includes the solicitation and award of procurement
contracts and all phases of procurement contract administration.

SENATE BILL 671
(p) (1) “Procurement contract” means an agreement in any form entered into
by a unit for procurement.
(2) “Procurement contract” does not include:
(i) a collective bargaining agreement with an employee
organization;
(ii) an agreement with a contractual employee, as defined in §
1–101(d) of the State Personnel and Pensions Article;
(iii) a Medicaid, Judicare, or similar reimbursement contract for
which law sets:
1. user or recipient eligibility; and
2. price payable by the State; or
(iv) a Medicaid contract with a managed care organization, as
defined in § 15–101(e) of the Health – General Article as to which regulations adopted by
the Department establish:
1. recipient eligibility;
2. minimum qualifications for managed care organizations;
and
3. criteria for enrolling recipients in managed care
organizations.
(q) “Procurement officer” means an individual authorized by a unit to:
(1) enter into a procurement contract;
(2) administer a procurement contract; or
(3) make determinations and findings with respect to a procurement
contract.
(r) “Proposal” means a response to any solicitation other than an invitation for
bids.
(s) “Request for proposals” means any document used for soliciting proposals.
(t) “Responsible bidder or offeror” means a person who:

SENATE BILL 671 9
(1) has the capability in all respects to perform fully the requirements for
a procurement contract; and
(2) possesses the integrity and reliability that will ensure good faith
performance.
(u) “Responsive bid” means a bid that:
(1) is submitted under § 13–103 of this article; and
(2) conforms in all material respects to the invitation for bids.
(v) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, “services”
means:
(i) the labor, time, or effort of a contractor; and
(ii) any product or report necessarily associated with the rendering
of a service.
(2) “Services” includes:
(i) services provided by attorneys, accountants, physicians,
consultants, and other professionals who are independent contractors; and
(ii) information technology services and cybersecurity.
(3) “Services” does not include:
(i) construction related services;
(ii) architectural services;
(iii) engineering services; or
(iv) energy performance contract services.
(w) “State” means:
(1) a state, possession, territory, or commonwealth of the United States; or
(2) the District of Columbia.
(x) (1) “State correctional facilities” means correctional institutions, and all
places of correctional confinement, that are located within the State of Maryland and are
primarily operated by the Maryland State government.

SENATE BILL 671
(2) “State correctional facilities” includes Patuxent Institution.
(y) “Statewide contract” means a contract that has been procured by a primary
procurement unit to be used by all units or any entity listed in § 4–316 of this article.
(Y–1) “SUBCONTRACTOR” MEANS A PERSON, OTHER THAN A LABORER OR
SUPPLIER OF MATERIALS, THAT MAKES AN AGREEMENT WITH:
(1) A CONTRACTOR TO PERFORM ALL OR PART OF A CONSTRUCTION
CONTRACT; OR
(2) A LOWER–TIER SUBCONTRACTOR TO PERFORM ALL OR PART OF A
CONSTRUCTION CONTRACT WITH THE LOWER–TIER SUBCONTRACTOR.
(z) (1) “Supplies” means:
(i) insurance;
(ii) tangible personal property including information technology
hardware and software;
(iii) printing; and
(iv) services necessarily associated with insurance or tangible
personal property.
(2) “Supplies” does not include:
(i) an interest in real property; or
(ii) tangible personal property acquired or used in connection with
an energy performance contract.
(aa) (1) “Unit” means an officer or other entity that is in the Executive Branch
of the State government and is authorized by law to enter into a procurement contract.
(2) “Unit” does not include:
(i) a bistate, multistate, bicounty, or multicounty governmental
agency; or
(ii) a special tax district, sanitary district, drainage district, soil
conservation district, water supply district, or other political subdivision of the State.
15–103.

SENATE BILL 671 11
(a) (1) [It] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, IT is the policy of the State to make a payment under a procurement contract
WITHIN 30 DAYS:
[(1)] (I) [within 30 days] after the day on which the payment becomes
due [and the unit receives a proper invoice] UNDER THE PROCUREMENT CONTRACT; or
(II) IF LATER, AFTER THE DAY ON WHICH THE UNIT RECEIVES A
PROPER INVOICE SUBMITTED UNDER THE TERMS OF THE PROCUREMENT
CONTRACT.
(2) [for] FOR a small business reserve contract, IT IS THE POLICY OF THE
STATE TO MAKE A PAYMENT within 15 days:
(I) after the day on which the payment becomes due [and the unit
receives a proper invoice] UNDER THE PROCUREMENT CONTRACT; OR
(II) IF LATER, AFTER THE DAY ON WHICH THE UNIT RECEIVES A
PROPER INVOICE SUBMITTED UNDER THE TERMS OF THE PROCUREMENT
CONTRACT.
[(b) Interest shall accrue in accordance with § 15–104 of this subtitle.]
(B) (1) A PROCUREMENT CONTRACT SHALL INCLUDE A PROVISION THAT
REQUIRES THE UNIT TO PAY THE CONTRACTOR:
(I) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE RECEIPT OF AN INVOICE
SUBMITTED UNDER THE TERMS OF THE PROCUREMENT CONTRACT FOLLOWING
SATISFACTORY COMPLETION OF THE PORTION OF THE WORK FOR WHICH THE
CONTRACTOR HAS PROPERLY INVOICED; AND
(II) INTEREST IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 15–104 OF THIS
SUBTITLE FOR ANY LATE PAYMENTS.
(2) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED
TO REQUIRE A UNIT TO PAY AMOUNTS INVOICED THAT ARE SUBJECT TO
WITHHOLDING AS A RESULT OF THE CONTRACTOR’S NONCOMPLIANCE WITH THE
PROCUREMENT CONTRACT.
(3) (I) IF A UNIT WITHHOLDS ALL OR PART OF AN AMOUNT
INVOICED BY A CONTRACTOR UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
UNIT SHALL NOTIFY THE CONTRACTOR IN WRITING, WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER THE
DATE OF THE RECEIPT OF THE INVOICE, OF:

SENATE BILL 671
1. THE UNIT’S INTENT TO WITHHOLD ALL OR PART OF
THE PAYMENT; AND
2. THE REASON FOR THE WITHHOLDING, INCLUDING
IDENTIFICATION OF THE WORK FOR WHICH PAYMENT IS NOT BEING MADE.
(II) A PAYMENT WITHHELD UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT
EXCEED TWICE THE AMOUNT IN DISPUTE.
(C) (1) A CONSTRUCTION CONTRACT SHALL INCLUDE A PROVISION THAT
REQUIRES A CONTRACTOR OR SUBCONTRACTOR TO PAY A SUBCONTRACTOR OR
LOWER–TIER SUBCONTRACTOR:
(I) WITHIN 7 DAYS AFTER THE RECEIPT OF PAYMENT BY THE
UNIT TO THE CONTRACTOR OR BY THE CONTRACTOR TO THE SUBCONTRACTOR, FOR
THE SATISFACTORY COMPLETION OF THE PORTION OF THE WORK FOR WHICH THE
SUBCONTRACTOR OR LOWER–TIER SUBCONTRACTOR HAS PROPERLY INVOICED;
AND
(II) INTEREST IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 15–104 OF THIS
SUBTITLE FOR ANY LATE PAYMENTS.
(2) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED
TO REQUIRE A CONTRACTOR OR SUBCONTRACTOR TO PAY AMOUNTS INVOICED THAT
ARE SUBJECT TO WITHHOLDING AS A RESULT OF THE SUBCONTRACTOR’S OR
LOWER–TIER SUBCONTRACTOR’S NONCOMPLIANCE WITH THE CONSTRUCTION
CONTRACT.
(3) (I) IF A CONTRACTOR OR SUBCONTRACTOR WITHHOLDS ALL
OR PART OF AN AMOUNT INVOICED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE CONTRACTOR OR SUBCONTRACTOR SHALL NOTIFY THE SUBCONTRACTOR OR
LOWER–TIER SUBCONTRACTOR IN WRITING, WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF
THE RECEIPT OF THE INVOICE, OF:
1. THE INTENT OF THE CONTRACTOR OR
SUBCONTRACTOR TO WITHHOLD ALL OR PART OF THE PAYMENT; AND
2. THE REASON FOR THE WITHHOLDING, INCLUDING
IDENTIFICATION OF THE WORK FOR WHICH PAYMENT IS NOT BEING MADE.
(II) A PAYMENT WITHHELD UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT
EXCEED TWICE THE AMOUNT IN DISPUTE.

SENATE BILL 671 13
(D) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO APPLY TO OR
PROHIBIT THE INCLUSION OF ANY RETAINAGE PROVISIONS IN A PROCUREMENT
CONTRACT OR CONSTRUCTION CONTRACT.
(E) IN THE CASE OF A SUCCESSFUL ACTION TO ENFORCE THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION, A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION SHALL
BE LIABLE FOR THE COSTS OF THE ACTION AND REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES AS
DETERMINED BY THE COURT.
15–104.
(a) [Except as provided in § 15–105 of this subtitle, interest] INTEREST shall
accrue at the rate of [9% per annum] 2% PER MONTH on any amount that:
(1) is due and payable by law and under the written procurement contract
OR CONSTRUCTION CONTRACT; and
(2) remains unpaid more than [37] 60 days after a unit receives an invoice
SUBMITTED UNDER THE TERMS OF THE CONTRACT.
(b) Interest shall accrue beginning on the [31st] 61ST day after:
(1) the day on which payment becomes due under a procurement contract
OR CONSTRUCTION CONTRACT; or
(2) if later, the day on which the unit receives an invoice SUBMITTED
UNDER THE TERMS OF THE CONTRACT.
(C) (1) INTEREST UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) SHALL BE PAID TO THE PERFORMING PARTY AT THE TIME
OF PAYMENT OF THE INVOICE; AND
(II) MAY NOT BE WITHHELD FROM A PERFORMING PARTY.
(2) THE REQUIREMENTS FOR THE ACCRUAL AND PAYMENT OF
INTEREST UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) MAY NOT BE WAIVED BY ANY PARTY; AND
(II) MAY NOT BE ALTERED BY CONTRACT.
[15–105.

SENATE BILL 671
A unit is not liable under § 15–104 of this subtitle for interest:
(1) unless within 30 days after the date on the State’s check for the amount
on which the interest accrued, the contractor submits an invoice for the interest;
(2) if a contract claim has been filed under Subtitle 2 of this title;
(3) accruing more than 1 year after the 31st day after the unit receives an
invoice; or
(4) on an amount that represents unpaid interest.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.